District of Columbia statutes.
7-2071.06

Data collection and reporting.

The Health Care Ombudsman shall submit annually to the Council, the Mayor, the Department of Health, and the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking a report on the activities, performance, and fiscal accounts of the Ombudsman Program, issues of concern to consumers, and the Ombudsman’s recommendations to improve health access. The report shall be available to the public upon request.

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-331, § 7, 52 DCR 1981